California, session 20252026, SB1160.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2.15 (commencing with Section 68652) is added to Title 8 of the Government Code, immediately following Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 68650), to read: CHAPTER 2.15. Eviction Proceedings68652. (a) By July 1, 2027, the Judicial Council shall assess the timeline by which each county court system shall have the ability to submit the following data points to the Judicial Council for unlawful detainer cases utilizing the Judicial Branch Statistical Information System (JBSIS):(1) Cases filed each month.(2) Cases that were subject to default, stipulated, and other types of pretrial and posttrial judgments.(3) Cases that were dismissed at the plaintiff’s request or by order of the court.(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, county court systems identified by the Judicial Council as able to report to the Judicial Council utilizing JBSIS shall submit the data points specified in subdivision (a) on a quarterly basis, aggregated by ZIP Code of the premises that is the subject of the action.(2) On or before January 1, 2029, all county court systems shall report the data points specified in subdivision (a) to the Judicial Council utilizing JBSIS on a quarterly basis, aggregated by ZIP Code of the premises that is the subject of the action.(c) Beginning January 1, 2029, and annually thereafter, the Judicial Council shall format the information received pursuant to subdivision (b) in an electronic spreadsheet and shall publicly post the spreadsheet on its internet website. The data shall be formatted as follows:(1) The data in the electronic spreadsheet shall be aggregated by ZIP Code.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if any county had an average of 100 or fewer unlawful detainer case filings during the previous five fiscal years, that county’s data shall only be provided in the electronic spreadsheet at the county level.SECTION 1.Chapter 2.15 (commencing with Section 68652) is added to Title 8 of the Government Code, immediately following Chapter 2.1, to read:2.15.Eviction Proceedings68652.(a)Each court shall report to the Judicial Council every month the total number of each of the following data points for unlawful detainer cases, aggregated by the ZIP Code of the premises in the lawsuit:(1)Cases filed each month.(2)Cases that were subject to default, stipulated, or other types of pretrial judgments already being tracked by the Judicial Council.(3)Cases that went to trial and, of those cases that went to trial, how many were a bench trial and how many were a jury trial.(4)Cases that were dismissed before trial at the plaintiff’s request.(b)The data points provided to the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only pertain to unlawful detainer cases filed on or after January 1, 2027.(c)Every four months, the Judicial Council shall format all information received pursuant to subdivision (a) in an electronic spreadsheet and publicly post the spreadsheet on its internet website.